Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.337

Temporary worker housing building permit—Plans and specifications—Fees—Rules.

(1) Any person who constructs, alters, or makes an addition to temporary worker housing consisting of five or more dwelling units, or any combination of dwelling units, dormitories, or spaces that house ten or more occupants, or any person who constructs, alters, or makes an addition to temporary worker housing who elects to comply with the temporary worker building code under RCW 70.114A.081(1)(g), shall:

(a) Submit plans and specifications for the alteration, addition, or new construction of this housing prior to beginning any alteration, addition, or new construction on this housing;

(b) Apply for and obtain a temporary worker housing building permit from the department prior to construction or alteration of this housing; and

(c) Submit a plan review and permit fee to the department of health pursuant to RCW 43.70.340.

(2) The department shall adopt rules as necessary, for the application procedures for the temporary worker housing plan review and permit process.

(3) Any alteration of a manufactured structure to be used for temporary worker housing remains subject to chapter 43.22 RCW, and the rules adopted under chapter 43.22 RCW.

[ 1998 c 37 s 6.]